Utah statutes.
63B-1-310.   Proceeds from sale of obligations -- Use.
(1)  The proceeds from the sale of obligations issued under this part may be
applied only for the purposes for which the obligations were issued.
(2)  Any accrued interest and premium received upon the sale, and any portion
of the proceeds that may not be needed for the purposes for which the
obligations were issued, shall be applied to the payment of the principal of,
or the interest on, the obligations.
